North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-24 North Dakota Compassionate Care Act [Repealed]

19-24-01.
Title. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-03.
Qualifying patient identification card application requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-04.
Designated caregiver registry identification card application requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-05.
Registry identification cards. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-06.
Addition of debilitating medical conditions. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-07.
Registration and operation of compassion centers. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-08.
Cultivation and growing of marijuana. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-09.
Onsite visits and interviews. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-10.
Severability. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-11.
Privacy of the compassionate care Act records and paperwork. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-12.
Facility restrictions. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24-13.
Compassionate care fund — Private donations. [Repealed]

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #5 on general election ballot approved November 8, 2016, effective December 8, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 171, § 6, effective April 18, 2017.